District of Columbia statutes.
8-1811

Penalty.

Each person who violates a provision of this subchapter shall pay a fine not to exceed $25 for the first violation, $50 for the second violation occurring within a 24-month period, and $100 for each subsequent violation occurring within a 24-month period.

History

Oct. 18, 1979, D.C. Law 3-30, § 12, 26 DCR 765
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-236, § 2(e), 40 DCR 614

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1011.
1973 Ed., § 6-2411.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Dangerous Dog Designation Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-351, August 12, 1996, 43 DCR 4553).